Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-127
Historical Heritage Center; location; how designated; Nebraska State Historical Society; duties; powers.

The Nebraska State Historical Society shall be responsible for the development of plans for the construction of a Historical Heritage Center on block 152 of the original plat of Lincoln, including lots 1 to 12, for the purpose of preserving, restoring, and interpreting the history of the people of Nebraska and the Central Great Plains. Such block is hereby designated as the Nebraska Historical Heritage Block. The society is hereby authorized to accept public and private funds for the purpose of constructing such building.

Laws 1974, LB 704, § 1.